Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201284-1217
State and local agencies; preservation
of records; administrator; advise.

The Records Management Act shall apply to all state and local agencies, and
the administrator shall advise and assist in the establishment of programs
for records management and for the selection and preservation of essential
records of the executive, judicial, and legislative branches and, as required by such
branches, shall provide program services pursuant to the act.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 17, p. 1393;

Laws 1969, c. 841, § 13, p. 3176;

Laws 1979, LB 559, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 24.
July 19, 2012